dictsource/gu_rules
.group ઝ
        ઝ          J#V
        _L22) ઝ (L21L21_         J#@      // generated
        _L22L22) ઝ (L21L21_      J#@      // generated
        L22) ઝ (L21L21_          J#@      // generated
        _L22) ઝ (L21L23_         J#       // generated
        _L22) ઝ (L21L23          J#       // generated
        _L22L22) ઝ (L21L23_      J#       // generated
        _L22L22) ઝ (L21L23       J#       // generated
        L22) ઝ (L21L23_          J#       // generated
        L22) ઝ (L21L23           J#       // generated
        _L22) ઝ (L21્_           J#@      // generated
        _L22) ઝ (L21્            J#@      // generated
        _L22L22) ઝ (L21્_        J#@      // generated
        _L22L22) ઝ (L21્         J#@      // generated
        L22) ઝ (L21્_            J#@      // generated
        L22) ઝ (L21્             J#@      // generated
        _L20L22) ઝ (L21_         J#@      // generated
        _L20L22) ઝ (L21L22_      J#@      // generated
        L20L22) ઝ (L21_          J#@      // generated
        L20L22) ઝ (L21L22_       J#@      // generated
        _L21L23) ઝ (L21L20_      J#       // generated
        _L21L23) ઝ (L21L20       J#       // generated
        L21L23) ઝ (L21L20_       J#       // generated
        L21L23) ઝ (L21L20        J#       // generated
        _L22) ઝ (L21ર_           J#       // generated
        _L22) ઝ (L21ર            J#       // generated
        _L22L22) ઝ (L21ર_        J#       // generated
        _L22L22) ઝ (L21ર         J#       // generated
        _L20) ઝ (પL22_           J#       // generated
        _L20) ઝ (પL22            J#       // generated
        _L22L20) ઝ (પL22_        J#       // generated
        _L22L20) ઝ (પL22         J#       // generated
        L20) ઝ (પL22_            J#       // generated
        L20) ઝ (પL22             J#       // generated
        _L22) ઝ (હL22_           J#       // generated
        _L22) ઝ (હL22            J#       // generated
        _L22L22) ઝ (હL22_        J#       // generated
        _L22L22) ઝ (હL22         J#       // generated
        L22) ઝ (હL22_            J#       // generated
        L22) ઝ (હL22             J#       // generated
        _ેL22) ઝ (L21_           J#@      // generated
        _ેL22) ઝ (L21L22_        J#@      // generated
        _ેL22) ઝ (L21            J#@      // generated
        ેL22) ઝ (L21_            J#@      // generated
        ેL22) ઝ (L21L22_         J#@      // generated
        ેL22) ઝ (L21             J#@      // generated
        રL22L22) ઝ (L21L20_      J#@      // generated
        રL22L22) ઝ (L21L20       J#@      // generated
        _L22) ઝ (L21ન_           J#       // generated
        _L22L22) ઝ (L21ન_        J#       // generated
        ઝઁ         J#V~        // + candrabindu
        ઝ (_       J#
        ઝ (B       J#

.group ઞ
        ઞ          n^V
        _L22) ઞ (L21L21_         n^@      // generated
        _L22L22) ઞ (L21L21_      n^@      // generated
        L22) ઞ (L21L21_          n^@      // generated
        _L22) ઞ (L21L23_         n^       // generated
        _L22) ઞ (L21L23          n^       // generated
        _L22L22) ઞ (L21L23_      n^       // generated
        _L22L22) ઞ (L21L23       n^       // generated
        L22) ઞ (L21L23_          n^       // generated
        L22) ઞ (L21L23           n^       // generated
        _L22) ઞ (L21્_           n^@      // generated
        _L22) ઞ (L21્            n^@      // generated
        _L22L22) ઞ (L21્_        n^@      // generated
        _L22L22) ઞ (L21્         n^@      // generated
        L22) ઞ (L21્_            n^@      // generated
        L22) ઞ (L21્             n^@      // generated
        _L20L22) ઞ (L21_         n^@      // generated
        _L20L22) ઞ (L21L22_      n^@      // generated
        L20L22) ઞ (L21_          n^@      // generated
        L20L22) ઞ (L21L22_       n^@      // generated
        _L21L23) ઞ (L21L20_      n^       // generated
        _L21L23) ઞ (L21L20       n^       // generated
        L21L23) ઞ (L21L20_       n^       // generated
        L21L23) ઞ (L21L20        n^       // generated
        _L22) ઞ (L21ર_           n^       // generated
        _L22) ઞ (L21ર            n^       // generated
        _L22L22) ઞ (L21ર_        n^       // generated
        _L22L22) ઞ (L21ર         n^       // generated
        _L20) ઞ (પL22_           n^       // generated
        _L20) ઞ (પL22            n^       // generated
        _L22L20) ઞ (પL22_        n^       // generated
        _L22L20) ઞ (પL22         n^       // generated
        L20) ઞ (પL22_            n^       // generated
        L20) ઞ (પL22             n^       // generated
        _L22) ઞ (હL22_           n^       // generated
        _L22) ઞ (હL22            n^       // generated
        _L22L22) ઞ (હL22_        n^       // generated
        _L22L22) ઞ (હL22         n^       // generated
        L22) ઞ (હL22_            n^       // generated
        L22) ઞ (હL22             n^       // generated
        _ેL22) ઞ (L21_           n^@      // generated
        _ેL22) ઞ (L21L22_        n^@      // generated
        _ેL22) ઞ (L21            n^@      // generated
        ેL22) ઞ (L21_            n^@      // generated
        ેL22) ઞ (L21L22_         n^@      // generated
        ેL22) ઞ (L21             n^@      // generated
        રL22L22) ઞ (L21L20_      n^@      // generated
        રL22L22) ઞ (L21L20       n^@      // generated
        _L22) ઞ (L21ન_           n^       // generated
        _L22L22) ઞ (L21ન_        n^       // generated
        ઞઁ         n^V~        // + candrabindu
        ઞ (_       n^
        ઞ (B       n^
     ્) ઞ (_       n^

.group ટ
        ટ          t.V
        _L22) ટ (L21L21_         t.@      // generated
        _L22L22) ટ (L21L21_      t.@      // generated
        L22) ટ (L21L21_          t.@      // generated
        _L22) ટ (L21L23_         t.       // generated
        _L22) ટ (L21L23          t.       // generated
        _L22L22) ટ (L21L23_      t.       // generated
        _L22L22) ટ (L21L23       t.       // generated
        L22) ટ (L21L23_          t.       // generated
        L22) ટ (L21L23           t.       // generated
        _L22) ટ (L21્_           t.@      // generated
        _L22) ટ (L21્            t.@      // generated
        _L22L22) ટ (L21્_        t.@      // generated
        _L22L22) ટ (L21્         t.@      // generated
        L22) ટ (L21્_            t.@      // generated
        L22) ટ (L21્             t.@      // generated
        _L20L22) ટ (L21_         t.@      // generated
        _L20L22) ટ (L21L22_      t.@      // generated
        L20L22) ટ (L21_          t.@      // generated
        L20L22) ટ (L21L22_       t.@      // generated
        _L21L23) ટ (L21L20_      t.       // generated
        _L21L23) ટ (L21L20       t.       // generated
        L21L23) ટ (L21L20_       t.       // generated
        L21L23) ટ (L21L20        t.       // generated
        _L22) ટ (L21ર_           t.       // generated
        _L22) ટ (L21ર            t.       // generated
        _L22L22) ટ (L21ર_        t.       // generated
        _L22L22) ટ (L21ર         t.       // generated
        _L20) ટ (પL22_           t.       // generated
        _L20) ટ (પL22            t.       // generated
        _L22L20) ટ (પL22_        t.       // generated
        _L22L20) ટ (પL22         t.       // generated
        L20) ટ (પL22_            t.       // generated
        L20) ટ (પL22             t.       // generated
        _L22) ટ (હL22_           t.       // generated
        _L22) ટ (હL22            t.       // generated
        _L22L22) ટ (હL22_        t.       // generated
        _L22L22) ટ (હL22         t.       // generated
        L22) ટ (હL22_            t.       // generated
        L22) ટ (હL22             t.       // generated
        _ેL22) ટ (L21_           t.@      // generated
        _ેL22) ટ (L21L22_        t.@      // generated
        _ેL22) ટ (L21            t.@      // generated
        ેL22) ટ (L21_            t.@      // generated
        ેL22) ટ (L21L22_         t.@      // generated
        ેL22) ટ (L21             t.@      // generated
        રL22L22) ટ (L21L20_      t.@      // generated
        રL22L22) ટ (L21L20       t.@      // generated
        _L22) ટ (L21ન_           t.       // generated
        _L22L22) ટ (L21ન_        t.       // generated
        ટઁ         t.V~        // + candrabindu
        ટ (_       t.
        ટ (B       t.
        ટ (્ય      t.:

        ટ્ટ          t.:V    // t.t. -> t.:
        ટ્ટ (_       t.:
        ટ્ટ (B       t.:

        ટ્ઠ          t.#:V    // t.t.# -> t.#:
        ટ્ઠ (_       t.#:
        ટ્ઠ (B       t.#:

.group ઠ
        ઠ          t.#V
        _L22) ઠ (L21L21_         t.#@     // generated
        _L22L22) ઠ (L21L21_      t.#@     // generated
        L22) ઠ (L21L21_          t.#@     // generated
        _L22) ઠ (L21L23_         t.#      // generated
        _L22) ઠ (L21L23          t.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ઠ (L21L23_      t.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ઠ (L21L23       t.#      // generated
        L22) ઠ (L21L23_          t.#      // generated
        L22) ઠ (L21L23           t.#      // generated
        _L22) ઠ (L21્_           t.#@     // generated
        _L22) ઠ (L21્            t.#@     // generated
        _L22L22) ઠ (L21્_        t.#@     // generated
        _L22L22) ઠ (L21્         t.#@     // generated
        L22) ઠ (L21્_            t.#@     // generated
        L22) ઠ (L21્             t.#@     // generated
        _L20L22) ઠ (L21_         t.#@     // generated
        _L20L22) ઠ (L21L22_      t.#@     // generated
        L20L22) ઠ (L21_          t.#@     // generated
        L20L22) ઠ (L21L22_       t.#@     // generated
        _L21L23) ઠ (L21L20_      t.#      // generated
        _L21L23) ઠ (L21L20       t.#      // generated
        L21L23) ઠ (L21L20_       t.#      // generated
        L21L23) ઠ (L21L20        t.#      // generated
        _L22) ઠ (L21ર_           t.#      // generated
        _L22) ઠ (L21ર            t.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ઠ (L21ર_        t.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ઠ (L21ર         t.#      // generated
        _L20) ઠ (પL22_           t.#      // generated
        _L20) ઠ (પL22            t.#      // generated
        _L22L20) ઠ (પL22_        t.#      // generated
        _L22L20) ઠ (પL22         t.#      // generated
        L20) ઠ (પL22_            t.#      // generated
        L20) ઠ (પL22             t.#      // generated
        _L22) ઠ (હL22_           t.#      // generated
        _L22) ઠ (હL22            t.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ઠ (હL22_        t.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ઠ (હL22         t.#      // generated
        L22) ઠ (હL22_            t.#      // generated
        L22) ઠ (હL22             t.#      // generated
        _ેL22) ઠ (L21_           t.#@     // generated
        _ેL22) ઠ (L21L22_        t.#@     // generated
        _ેL22) ઠ (L21            t.#@     // generated
        ેL22) ઠ (L21_            t.#@     // generated
        ેL22) ઠ (L21L22_         t.#@     // generated
        ેL22) ઠ (L21             t.#@     // generated
        રL22L22) ઠ (L21L20_      t.#@     // generated
        રL22L22) ઠ (L21L20       t.#@     // generated
        _L22) ઠ (L21ન_           t.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ઠ (L21ન_        t.#      // generated
        ઠઁ         t.#V~        // + candrabindu
        ઠ (_       t.#
        ઠ (B       t.#
